Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.030

Dental assistants—Registration.

The commission shall issue a registration to practice as a dental assistant to any applicant who pays any applicable fees, as established by the secretary in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250, and submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, and other information as determined by the secretary.

[ 2007 c 269 s 3.]